New York, session 2025-2026, A4060.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 10, 11, 12 and 13 of section 40 of the naviga- 2 tion law, subdivision 11 as renumbered by chapter 391 of the laws of 3 1971, are renumbered subdivisions 11, 12, 13 and 14 and a new subdivi- 4 sion 10 is added to read as follows: 5 10. Propeller guard. Every mechanically propelled vessel shall have 6 around each of its propellers a propeller guard. For the purposes of 7 this subdivision, a "propeller guard" shall be a device which encases 8 the propeller of a vessel to prevent the propeller from inadvertently 9 coming into contact with a person who comes too close to the propeller. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 11 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06290-01-5